Utah statutes.
59-10-509.   Notice of qualification as fiduciary.

Every receiver, trustee in bankruptcy, assignee for benefit of creditors, or other like fiduciary shall give the commission such notice of qualification in such capacity as the commission may by rule require.



Amended by Chapter 4, 1993 General Session

